Maine, session 132, LD255.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
Housing Authority - State 0442
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the manufactured and mobile home park
preservation and assistance program.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $3,500,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $3,500,000 $0